Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.130

Failure to attend—Contempt.

A person who, being duly summoned to attend as a witness before either house of the legislature, or any committee or joint committee thereof, or commissioner authorized to summon witnesses, refuses or neglects, without lawful excuse, to attend pursuant to such summons, shall be punished as for contempt, as hereinafter provided.

[ 1895 c 6 s 11; RRS s 8188.]